incubator/apertium-ckt/apertium-ckt.ckt.twoc
! We should probably have all the possible 
! symbols on the surface (not morphotactic!) side here
Alphabet

 А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И И К Ӄ Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ы Ъ Э Ю Я
 а б в г д е ё ж з и й к ӄ л м н ң о ө п р с т у ү ф х ц ч ш щ ь ы ъ э ю я
 
 %0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9

 %+ 

 %<v%>

 %[%+рэ%]:0 
 %[%+мыт%]:0 
 %[%+мын%]:0 
 %[%+мынъ%]:0 
 %[%+м%]:0 
 %[%+мъ%]:0 
 %[%+ӄ%]:0 
 %[%+н%]:0 
 %[%+нэ%]:0 
 %[%+т%]:0 
 %[%+мык%]:0 
 %[%+к%]:0 
 %[%+ны%]:0  
 %[%+нъ%]:0  

 %[%+sg1%]:0  
 %[%+pl1%]:0  
 %[%+pl2%]:0  
 %[%+sg2%]:0  
 %[%+sp3%]:0  

 %[%+ӄэна%]:0  
 %[%+cond%]:0 
 %[%+fut%]:0 
 %[%+intn%]:0 
 %[%+stat%]:0 
 %[%+inv%]:0 

 %[→%]:0 ;

Sets 

Verb = %<v%> ;

Rules 

"Circumfix Aorist т-[stem]-к (block [+т])"
%[%+т%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       _ (:*) %[%+к%]:0 ; 

"Circumfix Aorist т-[stem]-к (block [+к])"
%[%+к%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       %[%+т%]:0 (:*) _ ; 

"Circumfix Aorist мыт-[stem]-мык (block [+мыт])"
%[%+мыт%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       _ (:*) %[%+мык%]:0 ; 

"Circumfix Aorist т-[stem]-к (block [+к])"
%[%+к%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       %[%+т%]:0 (:*) _ ; 

"Circumfix Future рэ-[stem] (block [+рэ])"
%[%+рэ%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       _ (:*) %[%+fut%]:0 ; 

"Circumfix Conditional рэ-[stem] (block [+fut])"
%[%+fut%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       %[%+рэ%]:0 (:*) _ ; 

"Circumfix Conditional н-[stem] (block [+н])"
Sx:0 /<= _ ;
       except
         _ (:*) [ %[%+cond%]:0 | %[%+intn%]:0 ] ; 
     where Sx in ( %[%+н%] %[%+мъ%] %[%+мын%] %[%+мынъ%] %[%+ӄ%] ) ; 

"Circumfix Conditional н-[stem] (block [+cond])"
%[%+cond%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       [ %[%+н%]:0 | %[%+мъ%]:0 | %[%+мынъ%]:0  ] (:*) _ ; 

"Circumfix Intentional н-[stem] (block [+intn])"
%[%+intn%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       [ %[%+н%]:0 | %[%+м%]:0 | %[%+мын%]:0 | %[%+ӄ%]:0 ] (:*) _ ; 

"м-[stem] "
%[%+sg1%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       [ %[%+м%]:0 ] (:*) _ ; 


"ӄ-[stem] "
Sx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       [ %[%+ӄ%]:0 ] (:*) _ ; 
   where Sx in ( %[%+sg2%] %[%+pl2%] )  ;

"ӄ-[stem] "
%[%+ӄ%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       _ (:*) [ %[%+cond%]:0 | %[%+intn%]:0 ]  (:*) [ %[%+sg2%]:0 | %[%+pl2%]:0 ] ; 

"н-[stem] "
%[%+sp3%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       [ %[%+н%]:0 ] (:*) _ ; 

"н-[stem] "
%[%+pl1%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       [ %[%+мын%]:0 ] (:*) _ ; 


"Circumfix "
%[%+ны%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       _ (:*) [ %[%+ӄэна%]:0 | %[%+stat%]:0 ] ; 

"Circumfix"
%[%+ӄэна%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       %[%+ны%]:0 (:*) _ ; 

"Circumfix "
%[%+нэ%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       _ (:*) %[%+inv%]:0 ; 

"Circumfix"
%[%+inv%]:0 /<= _ ; 
   except
       %[%+нэ%]:0 (:*) _ ; 

"Incorp"
%[→%]:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       .#. [ ?* - %[→%]: ]* _ [ ?* - %[→%]: ]* .#. ; 
